Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 33

Installment Payment of Fuel Bills

65-33-101. Monthly average payment plans required.

Each utility company or service, serving over fifteen thousand (15,000) residential customers, providing electricity, natural gas, or other fuel to consumers in this state shall provide a method by which its customers may pay fuel bills monthly on an average basis.

Acts 1978, ch. 615, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-3501.

Cross-References. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments for electrical service, § 28-3-301.

65-33-102. Participation optional.

Participation in any payment-averaging program shall be optional, but shall be offered to each residential customer of a utility who has been a customer for at least twelve (12) months unless otherwise mutually agreed by the company and the customer.

Acts 1978, ch. 615, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-3502.

65-33-103. Payment of delinquent bill prior to participation.

A customer may be required to pay all delinquent bills before participating in a payment-averaging program.

Acts 1978, ch. 615, § 3; T.C.A., § 65-3503.

Cross-References. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments for electrical service, § 28-3-301.

65-33-104. Withdrawal from plan by customer.

A participating customer may withdraw from the payment-averaging program at any time by giving notice to the utility. When a customer leaves the program, the actual use by that customer up to that point shall be determined and, at the next billing date, the customer shall receive either a credit to the account or, upon written request, a payment in case of overestimated payment or shall pay the utility any amount not covered by that customer's averaged monthly payments.

Acts 1978, ch. 615, § 4; T.C.A., § 65-3504.

65-33-105. Cancellation of plan by customer delinquency.

A customer failing to make an average payment in any month may be subject to removal from the program in which case the computations required in § 65-33-104 will be made and the customer will resume being billed for actual use each billing period.

Acts 1978, ch. 615, § 5; T.C.A., § 65-3505.

65-33-106. Adjustment of payment to reflect rate changes.

If the cost of power or fuel supplies to a utility increases or decreases significantly at any time and appears likely to remain at this new level so that the adjustment in the twelfth month would exceed the averaged monthly payment, the utility may adjust the averaged monthly payments.

Acts 1978, ch. 615, § 6; T.C.A., § 65-3506.